Illinois, session 104th, SB2136.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 5changing Section 7.5 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 140/7.5)7    Sec. 7.5. Statutory exemptions. To the extent provided for 8by the statutes referenced below, the following shall be 9exempt from inspection and copying:10        (a) All information determined to be confidential 11    under Section 4002 of the Technology Advancement and 12    Development Act.13        (b) Library circulation and order records identifying 14    library users with specific materials under the Library 15    Records Confidentiality Act.16        (c) Applications, related documents, and medical 17    records received by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 18    Procedures Board and any and all documents or other 19    records prepared by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 20    Procedures Board or its staff relating to applications it 21    has received.22        (d) Information and records held by the Department of 23    Public Health and its authorized representatives relating   SB2136- 2 -LRB104 03597 RLC 13621 b1    to known or suspected cases of sexually transmitted 2    infection or any information the disclosure of which is 3    restricted under the Illinois Sexually Transmitted 4    Infection Control Act.5        (e) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 6    under Section 30 of the Radon Industry Licensing Act.7        (f) Firm performance evaluations under Section 55 of 8    the Architectural, Engineering, and Land Surveying 9    Qualifications Based Selection Act.10        (g) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 11    and exempted under Section 50 of the Illinois Prepaid 12    Tuition Act.13        (h) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 14    under the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act, and 15    records of any lawfully created State or local inspector 16    general's office that would be exempt if created or 17    obtained by an Executive Inspector General's office under 18    that Act.19        (i) Information contained in a local emergency energy 20    plan submitted to a municipality in accordance with a 21    local emergency energy plan ordinance that is adopted 22    under Section 11-21.5-5 of the Illinois Municipal Code.23        (j) Information and data concerning the distribution 24    of surcharge moneys collected and remitted by carriers 25    under the Emergency Telephone System Act.26        (k) Law enforcement officer identification information   SB2136- 3 -LRB104 03597 RLC 13621 b1    or driver identification information compiled by a law 2    enforcement agency or the Department of Transportation 3    under Section 11-212 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.4        (l) Records and information provided to a residential 5    health care facility resident sexual assault and death 6    review team or the Executive Council under the Abuse 7    Prevention Review Team Act.8        (m) Information provided to the predatory lending 9    database created pursuant to Article 3 of the Residential 10    Real Property Disclosure Act, except to the extent 11    authorized under that Article.12        (n) Defense budgets and petitions for certification of 13    compensation and expenses for court appointed trial 14    counsel as provided under Sections 10 and 15 of the 15    Capital Crimes Litigation Act (repealed). This subsection 16    (n) shall apply until the conclusion of the trial of the 17    case, even if the prosecution chooses not to pursue the 18    death penalty prior to trial or sentencing.19        (o) Information that is prohibited from being 20    disclosed under Section 4 of the Illinois Health and 21    Hazardous Substances Registry Act.22        (p) Security portions of system safety program plans, 23    investigation reports, surveys, schedules, lists, data, or 24    information compiled, collected, or prepared by or for the 25    Department of Transportation under Sections 2705-300 and 26    2705-616 of the Department of Transportation Law of the   SB2136- 4 -LRB104 03597 RLC 13621 b1    Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, the Regional 2    Transportation Authority under Section 2.11 of the 3    Regional Transportation Authority Act, or the St. Clair 4    County Transit District under the Bi-State Transit Safety 5    Act (repealed). 6        (q) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 7    Personnel Record Review Act. 8        (r) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 9    Illinois School Student Records Act. 10        (s) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 11    under Section 5-108 of the Public Utilities Act. 12        (t) (Blank). 13        (u) Records and information provided to an independent 14    team of experts under the Developmental Disability and 15    Mental Health Safety Act (also known as Brian's Law). 16        (v) Names and information of people who have applied 17    for or received Firearm Owner's Identification Cards under 18    the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act or applied for 19    or received a concealed carry license under the Firearm 20    Concealed Carry Act, unless otherwise authorized by the 21    Firearm Concealed Carry Act; and databases under the 22    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, records of the Concealed 23    Carry Licensing Review Board under the Firearm Concealed 24    Carry Act, and law enforcement agency objections under the 25    Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 26        (v-5) Records of the Firearm Owner's Identification   SB2136- 5 -LRB104 03597 RLC 13621 b1    Card Review Board that are exempted from disclosure under 2    Section 10 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.3        (w) Personally identifiable information which is 4    exempted from disclosure under subsection (g) of Section 5    19.1 of the Toll Highway Act.6        (x) Information which is exempted from disclosure 7    under Section 5-1014.3 of the Counties Code or Section 8    8-11-21 of the Illinois Municipal Code. 9        (y) Confidential information under the Adult 10    Protective Services Act and its predecessor enabling 11    statute, the Elder Abuse and Neglect Act, including 12    information about the identity and administrative finding 13    against any caregiver of a verified and substantiated 14    decision of abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of 15    an eligible adult maintained in the Registry established 16    under Section 7.5 of the Adult Protective Services Act. 17        (z) Records and information provided to a fatality 18    review team or the Illinois Fatality Review Team Advisory 19    Council under Section 15 of the Adult Protective Services 20    Act. 21        (aa) Information which is exempted from disclosure 22    under Section 2.37 of the Wildlife Code. 23        (bb) Information which is or was prohibited from 24    disclosure by the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. 25        (cc) Recordings made under the Law Enforcement 26    Officer-Worn Body Camera Act, except to the extent   SB2136- 6 -LRB104 03597 RLC 13621 b1    authorized under that Act.2        (dd) Information that is prohibited from being 3    disclosed under Section 45 of the Condominium and Common 4    Interest Community Ombudsperson Act. 5        (ee) Information that is exempted from disclosure 6    under Section 30.1 of the Pharmacy Practice Act. 7        (ff) Information that is exempted from disclosure 8    under the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act. 9        (gg) Information that is prohibited from being 10    disclosed under Section 7-603.5 of the Illinois Vehicle 11    Code. 12        (hh) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 13    Section 1A-16.7 of the Election Code. 14        (ii) Information which is exempted from disclosure 15    under Section 2505-800 of the Department of Revenue Law of 16    the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 17        (jj) Information and reports that are required to be 18    submitted to the Department of Labor by registering day 19    and temporary labor service agencies but are exempt from 20    disclosure under subsection (a-1) of Section 45 of the Day 21    and Temporary Labor Services Act. 22        (kk) Information prohibited from disclosure under the 23    Seizure and Forfeiture Reporting Act. 24        (ll) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 25    and exempted under Section 5-30.8 of the Illinois Public 26    Aid Code.   SB2136- 7 -LRB104 03597 RLC 13621 b1        (mm) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 2    Section 4.2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act. 3        (nn) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 4    Section 70 of the Higher Education Student Assistance Act. 5        (oo) Communications, notes, records, and reports 6    arising out of a peer support counseling session 7    prohibited from disclosure under the First Responders 8    Suicide Prevention Act. 9        (pp) Names and all identifying information relating to 10    an employee of an emergency services provider or law 11    enforcement agency under the First Responders Suicide 12    Prevention Act. 13        (qq) Information and records held by the Department of 14    Public Health and its authorized representatives collected 15    under the Reproductive Health Act. 16        (rr) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 17    the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 18        (ss) Data reported by an employer to the Department of 19    Human Rights pursuant to Section 2-108 of the Illinois 20    Human Rights Act.21        (tt) Recordings made under the Children's Advocacy 22    Center Act, except to the extent authorized under that 23    Act. 24        (uu) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 25    Section 50 of the Sexual Assault Evidence Submission Act. 26        (vv) Information that is exempt from disclosure under   SB2136- 8 -LRB104 03597 RLC 13621 b1    subsections (f) and (j) of Section 5-36 of the Illinois 2    Public Aid Code. 3        (ww) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 4    Section 16.8 of the State Treasurer Act. 5        (xx) Information that is exempt from disclosure or 6    information that shall not be made public under the 7    Illinois Insurance Code. 8        (yy) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 9    the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act.10        (zz) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 11    the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act. 12        (aaa) Information prohibited from being disclosed 13    under Section 1-167 of the Illinois Pension Code. 14        (bbb) Information that is prohibited from disclosure 15    by the Illinois Police Training Act and the Illinois State 16    Police Act. 17        (ccc) Records exempt from disclosure under Section 18    2605-304 of the Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 19    Administrative Code of Illinois. 20        (ddd) Information prohibited from being disclosed 21    under Section 35 of the Address Confidentiality for 22    Victims of Domestic Violence, Sexual Assault, Human 23    Trafficking, or Stalking Act. 24        (eee) Information prohibited from being disclosed 25    under subsection (b) of Section 75 of the Domestic 26    Violence Fatality Review Act.   SB2136- 9 -LRB104 03597 RLC 13621 b1        (fff) Images from cameras under the Expressway Camera 2    Act. This subsection (fff) is inoperative on and after 3    July 1, 2025. 4        (ggg) Information prohibited from disclosure under 5    paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 14 of the Nurse 6    Agency Licensing Act. 7        (hhh) (Blank). Information submitted to the Illinois 8    State Police in an affidavit or application for an assault 9    weapon endorsement, assault weapon attachment endorsement, 10    .50 caliber rifle endorsement, or .50 caliber cartridge 11    endorsement under the Firearm Owners Identification Card 12    Act. 13        (iii) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 50 of 14    the School Safety Drill Act. 15        (jjj) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 16    30 of the Insurance Data Security Law. 17        (kkk) Confidential business information prohibited 18    from disclosure under Section 45 of the Paint Stewardship 19    Act. 20        (lll) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 21    2-3.196 of the School Code. 22        (mmm) Information prohibited from being disclosed 23    under subsection (e) of Section 1-129 of the Illinois 24    Power Agency Act. 25        (nnn) Materials received by the Department of Commerce 26    and Economic Opportunity that are confidential under the   SB2136- 10 -LRB104 03597 RLC 13621 b1    Music and Musicians Tax Credit and Jobs Act. 2        (ooo) (nnn) Data or information provided pursuant to 3    Section 20 of the Statewide Recycling Needs and Assessment 4    Act. 5        (ppp) (nnn) Information that is exempt from disclosure 6    under Section 28-11 of the Lawful Health Care Activity 7    Act. 8        (qqq) (nnn) Information that is exempt from disclosure 9    under Section 7-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act. 10        (rrr) (mmm) Information prohibited from being 11    disclosed under Section 4-2 of the Uniform Money 12    Transmission Modernization Act. 13        (sss) (nnn) Information exempt from disclosure under 14    Section 40 of the Student-Athlete Endorsement Rights Act.15(Source: P.A. 102-36, eff. 6-25-21; 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 16102-292, eff. 1-1-22; 102-520, eff. 8-20-21; 102-559, eff. 178-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-946, eff. 7-1-22; 18102-1042, eff. 6-3-22; 102-1116, eff. 1-10-23; 103-8, eff. 196-7-23; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 103-142, eff. 1-1-24; 103-372, 20eff. 1-1-24; 103-472, eff. 8-1-24; 103-508, eff. 8-4-23; 21103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-592, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 227-1-24; 103-636, eff. 7-1-24; 103-724, eff. 1-1-25; 103-786, 23eff. 8-7-24; 103-859, eff. 8-9-24; 103-991, eff. 8-9-24; 24103-1049, eff. 8-9-24; revised 11-26-24.) 25    Section 10. The Firearm Owners Identification Card Act is   SB2136- 11 -LRB104 03597 RLC 13621 b1amended by changing Section 8 and by adding Section 8.6 as 2follows: 3    (430 ILCS 65/8)  (from Ch. 38, par. 83-8)4    Sec. 8. Grounds for denial and revocation. The Illinois 5State Police has authority to deny an application for or to 6revoke and seize a Firearm Owner's Identification Card 7previously issued under this Act only if the Illinois State 8Police finds that the applicant or the person to whom such card 9was issued is or was at the time of issuance:10        (a) A person under 21 years of age who has been 11    convicted of a misdemeanor other than a traffic offense or 12    adjudged delinquent;13        (b) This subsection (b) applies through the 180th day 14    following July 12, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 15    101-80). A person under 21 years of age who does not have 16    the written consent of his parent or guardian to acquire 17    and possess firearms and firearm ammunition, or whose 18    parent or guardian has revoked such written consent, or 19    where such parent or guardian does not qualify to have a 20    Firearm Owner's Identification Card;21        (b-5) This subsection (b-5) applies on and after the 22    181st day following July 12, 2019 (the effective date of 23    Public Act 101-80). A person under 21 years of age who is 24    not an active duty member of the United States Armed 25    Forces or the Illinois National Guard and does not have   SB2136- 12 -LRB104 03597 RLC 13621 b1    the written consent of his or her parent or guardian to 2    acquire and possess firearms and firearm ammunition, or 3    whose parent or guardian has revoked such written consent, 4    or where such parent or guardian does not qualify to have a 5    Firearm Owner's Identification Card; 6        (c) A person convicted of a felony under the laws of 7    this or any other jurisdiction;8        (d) A person addicted to narcotics;9        (e) A person who has been a patient of a mental health 10    facility within the past 5 years or a person who has been a 11    patient in a mental health facility more than 5 years ago 12    who has not received the certification required under 13    subsection (u) of this Section. An active law enforcement 14    officer employed by a unit of government or a Department 15    of Corrections employee authorized to possess firearms who 16    is denied, revoked, or has his or her Firearm Owner's 17    Identification Card seized under this subsection (e) may 18    obtain relief as described in subsection (c-5) of Section 19    10 of this Act if the officer or employee did not act in a 20    manner threatening to the officer or employee, another 21    person, or the public as determined by the treating 22    clinical psychologist or physician, and the officer or 23    employee seeks mental health treatment;24        (f) A person whose mental condition is of such a 25    nature that it poses a clear and present danger to the 26    applicant, any other person or persons, or the community;  SB2136- 13 -LRB104 03597 RLC 13621 b1        (g) A person who has an intellectual disability;2        (h) A person who intentionally makes a false statement 3    in the Firearm Owner's Identification Card application or 4    endorsement affidavit;5        (i) A noncitizen who is unlawfully present in the 6    United States under the laws of the United States;7        (i-5) A noncitizen who has been admitted to the United 8    States under a non-immigrant visa (as that term is defined 9    in Section 101(a)(26) of the Immigration and Nationality 10    Act (8 U.S.C. 1101(a)(26))), except that this subsection 11    (i-5) does not apply to any noncitizen who has been 12    lawfully admitted to the United States under a 13    non-immigrant visa if that noncitizen is:14            (1) admitted to the United States for lawful 15        hunting or sporting purposes;16            (2) an official representative of a foreign 17        government who is:18                (A) accredited to the United States Government 19            or the Government's mission to an international 20            organization having its headquarters in the United 21            States; or22                (B) en route to or from another country to 23            which that noncitizen is accredited;24            (3) an official of a foreign government or 25        distinguished foreign visitor who has been so 26        designated by the Department of State;  SB2136- 14 -LRB104 03597 RLC 13621 b1            (4) a foreign law enforcement officer of a 2        friendly foreign government entering the United States 3        on official business; or4            (5) one who has received a waiver from the 5        Attorney General of the United States pursuant to 18 6        U.S.C. 922(y)(3);7        (j) (Blank);8        (k) A person who has been convicted within the past 5 9    years of battery, assault, aggravated assault, violation 10    of an order of protection, or a substantially similar 11    offense in another jurisdiction, in which a firearm was 12    used or possessed;13        (l) A person who has been convicted of domestic 14    battery, aggravated domestic battery, or a substantially 15    similar offense in another jurisdiction committed before, 16    on or after January 1, 2012 (the effective date of Public 17    Act 97-158). If the applicant or person who has been 18    previously issued a Firearm Owner's Identification Card 19    under this Act knowingly and intelligently waives the 20    right to have an offense described in this paragraph (l) 21    tried by a jury, and by guilty plea or otherwise, results 22    in a conviction for an offense in which a domestic 23    relationship is not a required element of the offense but 24    in which a determination of the applicability of 18 U.S.C. 25    922(g)(9) is made under Section 112A-11.1 of the Code of 26    Criminal Procedure of 1963, an entry by the court of a   SB2136- 15 -LRB104 03597 RLC 13621 b1    judgment of conviction for that offense shall be grounds 2    for denying an application for and for revoking and 3    seizing a Firearm Owner's Identification Card previously 4    issued to the person under this Act;5        (m) (Blank);6        (n) A person who is prohibited from acquiring or 7    possessing firearms or firearm ammunition by any Illinois 8    State statute or by federal law;9        (o) A minor subject to a petition filed under Section 10    5-520 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 alleging that the 11    minor is a delinquent minor for the commission of an 12    offense that if committed by an adult would be a felony; 13        (p) An adult who had been adjudicated a delinquent 14    minor under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 for the 15    commission of an offense that if committed by an adult 16    would be a felony;17        (q) A person who is not a resident of the State of 18    Illinois, except as provided in subsection (a-10) of 19    Section 4; 20        (r) A person who has been adjudicated as a person with 21    a mental disability; 22        (s) A person who has been found to have a 23    developmental disability; 24        (t) A person involuntarily admitted into a mental 25    health facility; or 26        (u) A person who has had his or her Firearm Owner's   SB2136- 16 -LRB104 03597 RLC 13621 b1    Identification Card revoked or denied under subsection (e) 2    of this Section or item (iv) of paragraph (2) of 3    subsection (a) of Section 4 of this Act because he or she 4    was a patient in a mental health facility as provided in 5    subsection (e) of this Section, shall not be permitted to 6    obtain a Firearm Owner's Identification Card, after the 7    5-year period has lapsed, unless he or she has received a 8    mental health evaluation by a physician, clinical 9    psychologist, or qualified examiner as those terms are 10    defined in the Mental Health and Developmental 11    Disabilities Code, and has received a certification that 12    he or she is not a clear and present danger to himself, 13    herself, or others. The physician, clinical psychologist, 14    or qualified examiner making the certification and his or 15    her employer shall not be held criminally, civilly, or 16    professionally liable for making or not making the 17    certification required under this subsection, except for 18    willful or wanton misconduct. This subsection does not 19    apply to a person whose firearm possession rights have 20    been restored through administrative or judicial action 21    under Section 10 or 11 of this Act. 22    Upon revocation of a person's Firearm Owner's 23Identification Card, the Illinois State Police shall provide 24notice to the person and the person shall comply with Section 259.5 of this Act. 26(Source: P.A. 101-80, eff. 7-12-19; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21;   SB2136- 17 -LRB104 03597 RLC 13621 b1102-645, eff. 1-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1030, eff. 25-27-22; 102-1116, eff. 1-10-23.) 3    (430 ILCS 65/8.6 new)4    Sec. 8.6. Destruction of endorsement affidavits. On the 5effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 6Assembly or as soon thereafter as practicable, the Illinois 7State Police shall immediately and permanently destroy every 8endorsement affidavit that was provided to the Illinois State 9Police under Section 4.1 of this Act and subsection (d) of 10Section 24-1.9 of the Criminal Code of 2012 and all 11information collected from the endorsement affidavit in 12possession of the Illinois State Police and any law 13enforcement agency. 14    (430 ILCS 65/4.1 rep.)15    Section 15. The Firearm Owners Identification Card Act is 16amended by repealing Section 4.1. 17    Section 20. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 18changing Section 24-1 as follows: 19    (720 ILCS 5/24-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 24-1)20    Sec. 24-1. Unlawful possession of weapons. 21    (a) A person commits the offense of unlawful possession of 22weapons when he knowingly:  SB2136- 18 -LRB104 03597 RLC 13621 b1        (1) Sells, manufactures, purchases, possesses or 2    carries any bludgeon, black-jack, slung-shot, sand-club, 3    sand-bag, metal knuckles or other knuckle weapon 4    regardless of its composition, throwing star, or any 5    knife, commonly referred to as a switchblade knife, which 6    has a blade that opens automatically by hand pressure 7    applied to a button, spring or other device in the handle 8    of the knife, or a ballistic knife, which is a device that 9    propels a knifelike blade as a projectile by means of a 10    coil spring, elastic material or compressed gas; or11        (2) Carries or possesses with intent to use the same 12    unlawfully against another, a dagger, dirk, billy, 13    dangerous knife, razor, stiletto, broken bottle or other 14    piece of glass, stun gun or taser or any other dangerous or 15    deadly weapon or instrument of like character; or16        (2.5) Carries or possesses with intent to use the same 17    unlawfully against another, any firearm in a church, 18    synagogue, mosque, or other building, structure, or place 19    used for religious worship; or 20        (3) Carries on or about his person or in any vehicle, a 21    tear gas gun projector or bomb or any object containing 22    noxious liquid gas or substance, other than an object 23    containing a non-lethal noxious liquid gas or substance 24    designed solely for personal defense carried by a person 25    18 years of age or older; or26        (4) Carries or possesses in any vehicle or concealed   SB2136- 19 -LRB104 03597 RLC 13621 b1    on or about his person except when on his land or in his 2    own abode, legal dwelling, or fixed place of business, or 3    on the land or in the legal dwelling of another person as 4    an invitee with that person's permission, any pistol, 5    revolver, stun gun or taser or other firearm, except that 6    this subsection (a)(4) does not apply to or affect 7    transportation of weapons that meet one of the following 8    conditions:9            (i) are broken down in a non-functioning state; or10            (ii) are not immediately accessible; or11            (iii) are unloaded and enclosed in a case, firearm 12        carrying box, shipping box, or other container by a 13        person who has been issued a currently valid Firearm 14        Owner's Identification Card; or15            (iv) are carried or possessed in accordance with 16        the Firearm Concealed Carry Act by a person who has 17        been issued a currently valid license under the 18        Firearm Concealed Carry Act; or 19        (5) Sets a spring gun; or20        (6) Possesses any device or attachment of any kind 21    designed, used or intended for use in silencing the report 22    of any firearm; or23        (7) Sells, manufactures, purchases, possesses or 24    carries:25            (i) a machine gun, which shall be defined for the 26        purposes of this subsection as any weapon, which   SB2136- 20 -LRB104 03597 RLC 13621 b1        shoots, is designed to shoot, or can be readily 2        restored to shoot, automatically more than one shot 3        without manually reloading by a single function of the 4        trigger, including the frame or receiver of any such 5        weapon, or sells, manufactures, purchases, possesses, 6        or carries any combination of parts designed or 7        intended for use in converting any weapon into a 8        machine gun, or any combination or parts from which a 9        machine gun can be assembled if such parts are in the 10        possession or under the control of a person;11            (ii) any rifle having one or more barrels less 12        than 16 inches in length or a shotgun having one or 13        more barrels less than 18 inches in length or any 14        weapon made from a rifle or shotgun, whether by 15        alteration, modification, or otherwise, if such a 16        weapon as modified has an overall length of less than 17        26 inches; or18            (iii) any bomb, bomb-shell, grenade, bottle or 19        other container containing an explosive substance of 20        over one-quarter ounce for like purposes, such as, but 21        not limited to, black powder bombs and Molotov 22        cocktails or artillery projectiles; or23        (8) Carries or possesses any firearm, stun gun or 24    taser or other deadly weapon in any place which is 25    licensed to sell intoxicating beverages, or at any public 26    gathering held pursuant to a license issued by any   SB2136- 21 -LRB104 03597 RLC 13621 b1    governmental body or any public gathering at which an 2    admission is charged, excluding a place where a showing, 3    demonstration or lecture involving the exhibition of 4    unloaded firearms is conducted.5        This subsection (a)(8) does not apply to any auction 6    or raffle of a firearm held pursuant to a license or permit 7    issued by a governmental body, nor does it apply to 8    persons engaged in firearm safety training courses; or9        (9) Carries or possesses in a vehicle or on or about 10    his or her person any pistol, revolver, stun gun or taser 11    or firearm or ballistic knife, when he or she is hooded, 12    robed or masked in such manner as to conceal his or her 13    identity; or14        (10) Carries or possesses on or about his or her 15    person, upon any public street, alley, or other public 16    lands within the corporate limits of a city, village, or 17    incorporated town, except when an invitee thereon or 18    therein, for the purpose of the display of such weapon or 19    the lawful commerce in weapons, or except when on his land 20    or in his or her own abode, legal dwelling, or fixed place 21    of business, or on the land or in the legal dwelling of 22    another person as an invitee with that person's 23    permission, any pistol, revolver, stun gun, or taser or 24    other firearm, except that this subsection (a)(10) does 25    not apply to or affect transportation of weapons that meet 26    one of the following conditions:  SB2136- 22 -LRB104 03597 RLC 13621 b1            (i) are broken down in a non-functioning state; or2            (ii) are not immediately accessible; or3            (iii) are unloaded and enclosed in a case, firearm 4        carrying box, shipping box, or other container by a 5        person who has been issued a currently valid Firearm 6        Owner's Identification Card; or7            (iv) are carried or possessed in accordance with 8        the Firearm Concealed Carry Act by a person who has 9        been issued a currently valid license under the 10        Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 11        A "stun gun or taser", as used in this paragraph (a) 12    means (i) any device which is powered by electrical 13    charging units, such as, batteries, and which fires one or 14    several barbs attached to a length of wire and which, upon 15    hitting a human, can send out a current capable of 16    disrupting the person's nervous system in such a manner as 17    to render him incapable of normal functioning or (ii) any 18    device which is powered by electrical charging units, such 19    as batteries, and which, upon contact with a human or 20    clothing worn by a human, can send out current capable of 21    disrupting the person's nervous system in such a manner as 22    to render him incapable of normal functioning; or23        (11) Sells, manufactures, delivers, imports, 24    possesses, or purchases any assault weapon attachment or 25    .50 caliber cartridge in violation of Section 24-1.9 or 26    any explosive bullet. For purposes of this paragraph (a)   SB2136- 23 -LRB104 03597 RLC 13621 b1    "explosive bullet" means the projectile portion of an 2    ammunition cartridge which contains or carries an 3    explosive charge which will explode upon contact with the 4    flesh of a human or an animal. "Cartridge" means a tubular 5    metal case having a projectile affixed at the front 6    thereof and a cap or primer at the rear end thereof, with 7    the propellant contained in such tube between the 8    projectile and the cap; or9        (12) (Blank); or10        (13) Carries or possesses on or about his or her 11    person while in a building occupied by a unit of 12    government, a billy club, other weapon of like character, 13    or other instrument of like character intended for use as 14    a weapon. For the purposes of this Section, "billy club" 15    means a short stick or club commonly carried by police 16    officers which is either telescopic or constructed of a 17    solid piece of wood or other man-made material; or18        (14) Manufactures, possesses, sells, or offers to 19    sell, purchase, manufacture, import, transfer, or use any 20    device, part, kit, tool, accessory, or combination of 21    parts that is designed to and functions to increase the 22    rate of fire of a semiautomatic firearm above the standard 23    rate of fire for semiautomatic firearms that is not 24    equipped with that device, part, or combination of parts; 25    or26        (15) Carries or possesses any assault weapon or .50   SB2136- 24 -LRB104 03597 RLC 13621 b1    caliber rifle in violation of Section 24-1.9; or2        (16) Manufactures, sells, delivers, imports, or 3    purchases any assault weapon or .50 caliber rifle in 4    violation of Section 24-1.9. 5    (b) Sentence. A person convicted of a violation of 6subsection 24-1(a)(1) through (5), subsection 24-1(a)(10), 7subsection 24-1(a)(11), or subsection 24-1(a)(13), or 824-1(a)(15) commits a Class A misdemeanor. A person convicted 9of a violation of subsection 24-1(a)(8) or 24-1(a)(9) commits 10a Class 4 felony; a person convicted of a violation of 11subsection 24-1(a)(6), or 24-1(a)(7)(ii), 24-1(a)(7)(iii), or 1224-1(a)(16) or (iii) commits a Class 3 felony. A person 13convicted of a violation of subsection 24-1(a)(7)(i) commits a 14Class 2 felony and shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment 15of not less than 3 years and not more than 7 years, unless the 16weapon is possessed in the passenger compartment of a motor 17vehicle as defined in Section 1-146 of the Illinois Vehicle 18Code, or on the person, while the weapon is loaded, in which 19case it shall be a Class X felony. A person convicted of a 20second or subsequent violation of subsection 24-1(a)(4), 2124-1(a)(8), 24-1(a)(9), or 24-1(a)(10), or 24-1(a)(15) commits 22a Class 3 felony. A person convicted of a violation of 23subsection 24-1(a)(2.5) or 24-1(a)(14) commits a Class 2 24felony. The possession of each weapon or device in violation 25of this Section constitutes a single and separate violation.26    (c) Violations in specific places.  SB2136- 25 -LRB104 03597 RLC 13621 b1        (1) A person who violates subsection 24-1(a)(6) or 2    24-1(a)(7) in any school, regardless of the time of day or 3    the time of year, in residential property owned, operated 4    or managed by a public housing agency or leased by a public 5    housing agency as part of a scattered site or mixed-income 6    development, in a public park, in a courthouse, on the 7    real property comprising any school, regardless of the 8    time of day or the time of year, on residential property 9    owned, operated or managed by a public housing agency or 10    leased by a public housing agency as part of a scattered 11    site or mixed-income development, on the real property 12    comprising any public park, on the real property 13    comprising any courthouse, in any conveyance owned, leased 14    or contracted by a school to transport students to or from 15    school or a school related activity, in any conveyance 16    owned, leased, or contracted by a public transportation 17    agency, or on any public way within 1,000 feet of the real 18    property comprising any school, public park, courthouse, 19    public transportation facility, or residential property 20    owned, operated, or managed by a public housing agency or 21    leased by a public housing agency as part of a scattered 22    site or mixed-income development commits a Class 2 felony 23    and shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not 24    less than 3 years and not more than 7 years.25        (1.5) A person who violates subsection 24-1(a)(4), 26    24-1(a)(9), or 24-1(a)(10) in any school, regardless of   SB2136- 26 -LRB104 03597 RLC 13621 b1    the time of day or the time of year, in residential 2    property owned, operated, or managed by a public housing 3    agency or leased by a public housing agency as part of a 4    scattered site or mixed-income development, in a public 5    park, in a courthouse, on the real property comprising any 6    school, regardless of the time of day or the time of year, 7    on residential property owned, operated, or managed by a 8    public housing agency or leased by a public housing agency 9    as part of a scattered site or mixed-income development, 10    on the real property comprising any public park, on the 11    real property comprising any courthouse, in any conveyance 12    owned, leased, or contracted by a school to transport 13    students to or from school or a school related activity, 14    in any conveyance owned, leased, or contracted by a public 15    transportation agency, or on any public way within 1,000 16    feet of the real property comprising any school, public 17    park, courthouse, public transportation facility, or 18    residential property owned, operated, or managed by a 19    public housing agency or leased by a public housing agency 20    as part of a scattered site or mixed-income development 21    commits a Class 3 felony.22        (2) A person who violates subsection 24-1(a)(1), 23    24-1(a)(2), or 24-1(a)(3) in any school, regardless of the 24    time of day or the time of year, in residential property 25    owned, operated or managed by a public housing agency or 26    leased by a public housing agency as part of a scattered   SB2136- 27 -LRB104 03597 RLC 13621 b1    site or mixed-income development, in a public park, in a 2    courthouse, on the real property comprising any school, 3    regardless of the time of day or the time of year, on 4    residential property owned, operated or managed by a 5    public housing agency or leased by a public housing agency 6    as part of a scattered site or mixed-income development, 7    on the real property comprising any public park, on the 8    real property comprising any courthouse, in any conveyance 9    owned, leased or contracted by a school to transport 10    students to or from school or a school related activity, 11    in any conveyance owned, leased, or contracted by a public 12    transportation agency, or on any public way within 1,000 13    feet of the real property comprising any school, public 14    park, courthouse, public transportation facility, or 15    residential property owned, operated, or managed by a 16    public housing agency or leased by a public housing agency 17    as part of a scattered site or mixed-income development 18    commits a Class 4 felony. "Courthouse" means any building 19    that is used by the Circuit, Appellate, or Supreme Court 20    of this State for the conduct of official business.21        (3) Paragraphs (1), (1.5), and (2) of this subsection 22    (c) shall not apply to law enforcement officers or 23    security officers of such school, college, or university 24    or to students carrying or possessing firearms for use in 25    training courses, parades, hunting, target shooting on 26    school ranges, or otherwise with the consent of school   SB2136- 28 -LRB104 03597 RLC 13621 b1    authorities and which firearms are transported unloaded 2    enclosed in a suitable case, box, or transportation 3    package.4        (4) For the purposes of this subsection (c), "school" 5    means any public or private elementary or secondary 6    school, community college, college, or university.7        (5) For the purposes of this subsection (c), "public 8    transportation agency" means a public or private agency 9    that provides for the transportation or conveyance of 10    persons by means available to the general public, except 11    for transportation by automobiles not used for conveyance 12    of the general public as passengers; and "public 13    transportation facility" means a terminal or other place 14    where one may obtain public transportation. 15    (d) The presence in an automobile other than a public 16omnibus of any weapon, instrument or substance referred to in 17subsection (a)(7) is prima facie evidence that it is in the 18possession of, and is being carried by, all persons occupying 19such automobile at the time such weapon, instrument or 20substance is found, except under the following circumstances: 21(i) if such weapon, instrument or instrumentality is found 22upon the person of one of the occupants therein; or (ii) if 23such weapon, instrument or substance is found in an automobile 24operated for hire by a duly licensed driver in the due, lawful 25and proper pursuit of his or her trade, then such presumption 26shall not apply to the driver.  SB2136- 29 -LRB104 03597 RLC 13621 b1    (e) Exemptions.2        (1) Crossbows, Common or Compound bows and Underwater 3    Spearguns are exempted from the definition of ballistic 4    knife as defined in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of 5    this Section.6        (2) The provision of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) 7    of this Section prohibiting the sale, manufacture, 8    purchase, possession, or carrying of any knife, commonly 9    referred to as a switchblade knife, which has a blade that 10    opens automatically by hand pressure applied to a button, 11    spring or other device in the handle of the knife, does not 12    apply to a person who possesses a currently valid Firearm 13    Owner's Identification Card previously issued in his or 14    her name by the Illinois State Police or to a person or an 15    entity engaged in the business of selling or manufacturing 16    switchblade knives. 17(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-1116, eff. 1-10-23; 18103-822, eff. 1-1-25.) 19    (720 ILCS 5/24-1.9 rep.)20    (720 ILCS 5/24-1.10 rep.)21    Section 25. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 22repealing Sections 24-1.9 and 24-1.10. 23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 24becoming law.